Louisiana, session 2026, SB30.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1223.4(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1223.4. Telehealth; rulemaking required
* * *
D. The Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners and the Louisiana
State Board of Nursing shall not adopt or enforce any rule or policy that
prohibits a licensed healthcare provider under the jurisdiction of either board
from using telehealth to evaluate, diagnose, or treat obesity or provide weight
management services, provided the healthcare provider conducts a synchronous
interaction with the patient and acts within the scope of his license and in
accordance with the applicable standard of care.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 30 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.